Utah statutes.
67-19-6.1.   Department field offices.

(1)  The executive director of the Department of Human Resource Management may establish a field office in an agency.

(2)  The executive director may assign an employee of the department to act as field office staff.

(3)  The executive director and agency head shall sign an agreement, to be reviewed annually, that specifies:

(a)  the services to be provided by the department;

(b)  the use of agency facilities and equipment by the field office;

(c)  protocols to resolve discrepancies between agency practice and Department of Human Resource Management policy; and

(d)  any other issue necessary for the proper functioning of the field office.

(4)  Unless otherwise provided for in the field office agreement, the agency shall:

(a)  assign responsibilities and duties to its employees;

(b)  conduct performance appraisals;

(c)  discipline its employees in consultation with the department; and

(d)  maintain individual personnel records.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2010 General Session

